Maryland, session 2026, SB0347.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0347*

SENATE BILL 347
10–119.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “License” has the meaning stated in § 11–128 of the Transportation
Article.
(3) “Motor Vehicle Administration” means the Motor Vehicle
Administration of the Department of Transportation.
(b) (1) Subject to the provisions of subsection (c) of this section, the
Administration may notify the Motor Vehicle Administration of an obligor with a
noncommercial or commercial license who is 120 days or more out of compliance[,] with the
most recent order of the court in making child support payments if:
(i) the Administration has accepted an assignment of support under
§ 5–312(b)(2) of the Human Services Article; or
(ii) 1. the recipient of support payments has filed an application
for support enforcement services with the Administration; AND
2. A. THE ADMINISTRATION VERIFIES THAT
SUSPENSION OF THE OBLIGOR’S LICENSE OR PRIVILEGE TO DRIVE IS APPROPRIATE
BECAUSE THE OBLIGOR HAS THE FUNDS TO PAY BUT IS MAKING THE FREE AND
CONSCIOUS CHOICE TO WITHHOLD PAYMENT; AND
B. OTHER COLLECTION AND ENFORCEMENT
MECHANISMS HAVE BEEN UNSUCCESSFUL.
(2) Upon notification by the Administration under this subsection, the
Motor Vehicle Administration:
(i) shall suspend the obligor’s license or privilege to drive in the
State; and
(ii) may issue a work–restricted license or work–restricted privilege
to drive in the State in accordance with § 16–203 of the Transportation Article.
(c) (1) Before supplying any information to the Motor Vehicle Administration
under this section, the Administration shall:
(i) VERIFY THAT SUSPENSION OF THE OBLIGOR’S LICENSE OR
PRIVILEGE TO DRIVE IS APPROPRIATE AND send written AND ELECTRONIC notice of
the proposed action to the obligor, including notice of the obligor’s right to request an
investigation on any of the following grounds:

SENATE BILL 347 3
1. the information regarding the reported arrearage is
inaccurate;
2. THE MINOR CHILD IS RESIDING PRIMARILY WITH THE
OBLIGOR;
3. THE ADMINISTRATION REACHED AN AGREEMENT
WITH THE OBLIGOR, OR THE COURT ISSUED AN ORDER FOR A SCHEDULED PAYMENT
OF THE ARREARAGES, AND THE OBLIGOR IS COMPLYING WITH THE AGREEMENT OR
THE ORDER;
[2.] 4. suspension of the obligor’s license or privilege to drive
would be an impediment to the obligor’s current or potential employment; or
[3.] 5. suspension of the obligor’s license or privilege to drive
would place an undue hardship on the MINOR CHILD, THE CHILD SUPPORT PAYMENT
RECIPIENT, OR THE obligor because of the obligor’s:
A. documented disability resulting in a verified inability to
work; or
B. inability to comply with the court order; and
(ii) give the obligor a reasonable opportunity to request an
investigation of the proposed action of the Administration.
(2) (i) Upon receipt of a request for investigation from the obligor, the
Administration shall conduct an investigation to determine if any of the grounds under
paragraph (1)(i) of this subsection exist.
(ii) The Administration shall:
1. send a copy of the obligor’s request for an investigation to
the obligee by first–class mail;
2. give the obligee a reasonable opportunity to respond; and
3. consider the obligee’s response.
(iii) Upon completion of the investigation, the Administration shall
notify the obligor IN WRITING AND ELECTRONICALLY of the results of the investigation
and the obligor’s right to appeal to the Office of Administrative Hearings.
(3) (i) An appeal under this section shall be conducted in accordance
with Title 10, Subtitle 2 of the State Government Article.

SENATE BILL 347
(ii) An appeal shall be made in writing and shall be received by the
Office of Administrative Hearings within 20 days after the notice to the obligor of the
results of the investigation.
(4) If, after the investigation or appeal to the Office of Administrative
Hearings, the Administration finds that one of the grounds under paragraph (1)(i) of this
subsection exists, the Administration may not send any information about the obligor to
the Motor Vehicle Administration.
(5) The Administration may not send any information about an obligor to
the Motor Vehicle Administration if:
(i) 1. the Administration reaches an agreement with the obligor
regarding a scheduled payment of the obligor’s child support arrearage or a court issues an
order for a scheduled payment of the child support arrearage; and
[(ii)] 2. the obligor is complying with the agreement or court order;
OR
(II) THE ADMINISTRATION INVESTIGATES ONE OF THE
GROUNDS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND DETERMINES THAT
SUSPENSION OF THE OBLIGOR’S LICENSE OR PRIVILEGE IS NOT APPROPRIATE.
12–201.
(q) “Voluntarily impoverished” means that a parent has made the free and
conscious choice, not compelled by factors beyond the parent’s control, to render the parent
without adequate resources.
Article – Transportation
16–203.
(a) In this section, “Child Support Administration” means the Child Support
Administration of the Department of Human Services.
(b) On notification by the Child Support Administration in accordance with §
10–119 of the Family Law Article that an obligor is 120 days or more out of compliance
with the most recent order of the court in making child support payments, the
Administration:
(1) Shall suspend an obligor’s license or privilege to drive in the State; and
(2) May issue a work–restricted license or work–restricted privilege to
drive.

SENATE BILL 347 5
(c) (1) Prior to the suspension of a license or the privilege to drive in the State
and the issuance of a work–restricted license or work–restricted privilege to drive under
subsection (b) of this section, the Administration shall send written AND ELECTRONIC
notice of the proposed action to the obligor, including notice of the obligor’s right to contest
the accuracy of the information.
(2) Any contest under this subsection shall be limited to whether the
Administration has mistaken the identity of the obligor or the individual whose license or
privilege to drive has been suspended.
(d) (1) An obligor may appeal a decision of the Administration to suspend the
obligor’s license or privilege to drive.
(2) At a hearing under this subsection, the issue shall be limited to whether
the Administration has mistaken the identity of the obligor or the individual whose license
or privilege to drive has been suspended.
(e) The Administration shall reinstate an obligor’s license or privilege to drive in
the State if:
(1) The Administration receives a court order to reinstate the license or
privilege to drive; or
(2) The Child Support Administration notifies the Administration that:
(i) The individual whose license or privilege to drive was suspended
is not in arrears in making child support payments;
(ii) The obligor has paid the support arrearage in full;
(iii) The obligor has demonstrated good faith by paying the ordered
amount of support for 6 consecutive months;
(iv) The obligor is a participant in full compliance in an employment
program approved by the Child Support Administration; or
(v) One of the grounds under § 10–119(c)(1)(i) of the Family Law
Article exists.
(f) The Secretary of Transportation, in cooperation with the Secretary of Human
Services and the Office of Administrative Hearings, shall adopt regulations to implement
this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.